hr-HR: Snaga ribanja: Iznimno teški poslovi; Za teške poslove; Za lake poslove; Protiv ogrebotina; Srednja jačina; Ostalo
sv: Skrubbstyrka: Extra tung tyll (avgift); Kraftig; Lättvikt; Repfri; Vanlig tyll (avgift); Annat
ko: 세척 강도: 강력 세척용; 헤비 듀티; 라이트 듀티; 스크래치 방지용; 일반용; 기타
ja: 洗浄力: 超ヘビーデューティー; ヘビーデューティ; ライトデューティ; 傷防止; レギュラーデューティ―; その他
fi: Hankausvoimakkuus: Erittäin raskas käyttö; Raskaaseen käyttöön; Kevyeen käyttöön; Naarmuuntumaton; Tavallinen käyttö; Muu
zh-CN: 擦洗强度: 超强力; 强力; 轻力; 无划痕; 常规; 其他
sk-SK: Odolnosť voči oderu: Na veľmi odolné nečistoty; Vysoká záťaž; Nízka záťaž; Bez škrabania; Na štandardné nečistoty; Iné
pl: Siła szorowania: Bardzo wysoka wytrzymałość; Wzmocnione; Lekkie; Bez zarysowań; Standardowa wytrzymałość; Inne
en: Scrubbing strength: Extra heavy duty; Heavy duty; Light duty; Non-scratch; Regular duty; Other
nl: Schrobkracht: Extra zwaar gebruik; Zwaar werk; Licht werk; Krasbestending; Normaal gebruik; Overig
hu: Súrolási erősség: Extra nagy; Nagy teherbírású; Kis teherbírású; Karcmentes; Normál; Egyéb
el: Ένταση καθαρισμού: Έξτρα βαρύ δασμοί; Μεγάλης αντοχής; Ελαφράς αντοχής; Χωρίς γρατσουνιά; Κανονικοί δασμοί; Άλλο
th: ความแรงในการขัด: ระดับงานหนักพิเศษ; การใช้งานหนัก; การใช้งานเบา; ป้องกันรอยขีดข่วน; ระดับงานปกติ; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Moč drgnjenja: Zelo težka dela; Močna; Lahka; Ne praska; Redna dolžnost; Druga
tr: Ovma gücü: Ekstra ağır hizmet tipi; Ekstra dayanıklı; Hafif iş; Çizmez; Standart hizmet tipi; Diğer
de: Scheuerfestigkeit: Extra stark; Schwerlast; Leichtlast; Nicht scheuernd; Regulär; Sonstiges
da: Skrubbestyrke: Ekstra tungt; Kraftig ydelse; Let ydelse; Ridsefri; Normalt; Andet
pt-PT: Força de esfregamento: Extra resistente; Para trabalhos pesados; Para trabalhos leves; Não risca; Regular; Outro
nb: Skrubbestyrke: Ekstra tunge bompengeskilt; Tungt arbeid; Lett arbeid; Ripefri; Vanlige bompengeavgifter; Annet
vi: Cường độ chà rửa: Chịu tải cực nặng; Nặng; Nhẹ; Không gây trầy xước; Tải trọng thông thường; Khác
pt-BR: Força de escovação: Uso extra pesado; Serviço pesado; Serviço leve; Não risca; Uso regular; Outro
es: Fuerza de fregado: Resistencia extra pesada; Alta resistencia; Intensidad baja; No raya; Resistencia normal; Otros
bg-BG: Сила на триене: С извънредна издръжливост; Голяма издръжливост; Малка издръжливост; Без надраскване; Редовни задължения; Друго
ru: Степень абразивности: Особо прочная; Для сильных загрязнений; Для легкой очистки; Без царапин; Режим обычной нагрузки; Другое
lt-LT: Šveitimo stiprumas: Ypač didelės apkrovos; Patvarus; Lengvos apkrovos; Nebraižantis; Įprastos apkrovos; Kita
cs: Síla drhnutí: Na extra odolné nečistoty; Intenzivní znečištění; Lehké znečištění; Šetrné k povrchu; Na běžné nečistoty; Jiné
zh-TW: 刷洗強度: 極強; 強; 弱; 不刮花; 一般效果; 其他
ro-RO: Puterea de frecare: Rezistență extra; De înaltă rezistență; Ușor; Antizgârieturi; Rezistență standard; Altele
it: Forza di sfregamento: Extra resistente; Molto pesante; Molto leggero; Antigraffio; Uso regolare; Altro
fr: Puissance de nettoyage: Extra robuste; À toute épreuve; Léger; Non rayant; Usage standard; Autre